src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-hoapen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - hoapen: # Verb 'to hope' - full paradigm
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [hoape, höäpe]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [hoapst, höäpst]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [hoapt, höäpt]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [hoapet, höäpet, hoapen, höäpen]

     hoapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [hoapde, höäpde]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [hoapdest, höäpdest]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [hoapde, höäpde]
     hoapen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [hoapden, höäpden]

     hoapen+V+Inf:  [hoapen, höäpen]
     hoapen+V+PrfPrc:  [hoaped, höäped]
     hoapen+V+PrsPrc:  [hoapen, höäpen]

     hoapen+V+Imprt+Sg2:  [hoap, höäp]
     hoapen+V+Imprt+Pl2:  [hoapet, höäpet]
